src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!! # Kven numerals


LEXICON NUM 
!! Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
!! of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral
!!€ kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par ! 23,000
!!€ kakskymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kahđessađasneljes: kahđes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#sađas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom  ! 204rd
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä  ! 50-ish

0    NUM_CARD_ALL    ;
0    NUM_ORD_ALL ;
0    NUM_OTHERS  ;

 +Use/Circ: ARABICS ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !

LEXICON NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG
+Num: # ;


LEXICON NUM_OTHERS
!! There is a set of numbers or corresponding expressions that work like them,
!! but are not basic cardinals or ordinals:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral others
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä
yksisen:yksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kaksisen:kaksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yhtisen:yhtisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kahtisen:kahtisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kolmisen:kolmisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
nelisen:nelisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
viitisen:viitisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kuutisen:kuutisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
seittemisen:seittemisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
kahđeksisen:kahđeksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
yhđeksisen:yhđeksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
pari+Num:par           NUM_PARI ;

!! ## Numeral stem variation
!! Numerals follow the same stem variation patterns as nouns, some of these
!! being very rare to extinct for nouns. 
LEXICON NUM_YKSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ yks: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom !sallima puhekieliset haamut ko "yks" ja "kaks"
!!€ yhtheen: yksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ yhđessä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhđelä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ yhtä: yksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ yksii: yksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ yksiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ ykshiin: yksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ksi   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:ks   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:ht    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:hđe   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:hđe   NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:h     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ; 
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 31 back§
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kaks: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom !sallima puhekieliset haamut ko "yks" ja "kaks"
!!€ kahtheen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kahđessa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahđela: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kahta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kaksii: kaksi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kakshiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine
0:ksi   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:ks   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:ht    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;        
0:hđe   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:hđe   NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:h     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 8~5
!!€ kolme: kolme+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kolmheen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolmena: kolme+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kolmessa: kolme+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kolmela: kolme+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kolmee: kolme+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kolmii: kolme+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kolmiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kolmhiin: kolme+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kolmina: kolme+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kolmissa: kolme+Num+Pl+Ine
0:e     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ; 
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_E ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ; 
0       NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0       NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10
!!€ nelje: nelje+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ neljee: nelje+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ neljheen: nelje+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ neljenä: nelje+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ neljessä: nelje+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ neljelä: nelje+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ neljii: nelje+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ neljiin: nelje+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ neljein: nelje+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ neljhiin: nelje+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ neljinä: nelje+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ neljissä: nelje+Num+Pl+Ine
0:e  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Err/Orth:ä  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0   NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN   ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;

LEXICON NUM_VIISI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 front
!!€ viisi: viisi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ viis: viisi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ viitheen: viisi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ viittä: viisi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ viiđessä: viisi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ viiđelä: viisi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ viitenä: viisi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ viisissä: viisi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ viissii: viisi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ viissiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ viitten: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ viishiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ viisinä: viisi+Num+Pl+Ess
0:si    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:s  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:t     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:đe    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:đe    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUSI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 27 back
!!€ kuusi: kuusi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kuus: kuusi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kuutta: kuusi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kuutena: kuusi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kuuđessa: kuusi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kuuđela: kuusi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kuusina: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kuusissa: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kuussii: kuusi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ kuussiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuutten: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen !harvinainen muoto
!!€ kuushiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Ill
0:si    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
+Use/NG:s   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ; 
0:t     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ; 
0:đe    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:đe    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L     ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_CARD_ALL
yksi+Num:y             NUM_YKSI  ;
kaksi+Num:ka           NUM_KAKSI ;
kolme+Num:kolm         NUM_KOLME ;
nelje+Num:nelj         NUM_NELJÄ ;
viisi+Num:vii          NUM_VIISI ;
kuusi+Num:kuu          NUM_KUUSI ;
LEXICON NUM_CARD_SUFFIX
kymmentä    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
sataa       NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
tuhatta     NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
kymmentätuhatta NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
sataatuhatta    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
miljoonaa       NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
miljardia       NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG   ;
biljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
biljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
triljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
triljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvadriljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvadriljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvintiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvintiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sekstiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sekstiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
oktiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
oktiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
noviljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
noviljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
undekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
undekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
duodekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
duodekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
tredekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
tredekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvattuordekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvattuordekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvindekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kvindekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sedekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sedekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
septendekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
septendekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
oktodekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
oktodekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
novemdekiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
novemdekiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
vidingtiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
vidingtiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
tridingtiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
tridingtiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sentiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
sentiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kiljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
kiljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
piljoonaa NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
piljardia NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG ;
toista              NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
kolmatta          NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
neljättä          NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
kuudetta          NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
viidettä          NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
seitsemättä    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
kahdeksatta    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
yhdeksättä      NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
kymmenettä      NUM_CARD_SUFFIX_TAG    ;
